Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 11

Inmate Reimbursement to the County Act of 1995

41-11-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Inmate Reimbursement to the County Act of 1995.”

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 2.

41-11-102. “County jail” defined.

For purposes of this chapter, “county jail” includes county workhouses.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 3.

41-11-103. Reimbursement of imprisonment expenses.

A county may seek reimbursement for any expense incurred by the county in relation to the charge or charges for which a person was sentenced to a county jail. The county may seek reimbursement for each person who is or was an inmate for not more than sixty dollars ($60.00) a day for the expense of maintaining the inmate or the actual per diem cost of maintaining the inmate, whichever is less, for the entire time the person was confined in the county jail, including any period of pretrial detention.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 4.

41-11-104. Denial of certain privileges prohibited.

The failure of an inmate to provide information on the inmate's financial status shall not be grounds for the denial by the county of any privilege ordinarily available to an inmate, such as behavior or programmatic credits, parole or participation in work programs.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 5.

41-11-105. Reporting of inmates and financial and other information.

At the request of the county mayor or a designee of the county mayor, the sheriff of the county shall forward to the county mayor or designee of the county mayor a list containing the name of each inmate, the term of sentence and the date of admission, together with information regarding the financial status of each inmate, as required by the county mayor or designee of the county mayor.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 6; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-11-106. Investigation of reports.

The county legislative body or the county mayor may investigate or cause to be investigated all reports furnished by the sheriff pursuant to § 41-11-105 for the purpose of securing reimbursement for the expenses incurred by the county in regard to an inmate as provided under this chapter.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 7; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-11-107. Reimbursement of expenses — Civil action.

The county mayor may file a civil action to seek reimbursement from an inmate for maintenance and support of that person while that person was an inmate or for any other expense for which the county may be reimbursed under this chapter.

A civil action brought under this chapter shall be instituted in the name of the county in which the jail is located and shall state the date and place of sentence, the length of time set forth in the sentence, the length of time actually served and the amount or amounts due to the county pursuant to § 41-11-103.

Before entering any order on behalf of the county against the defendant, the court shall take into consideration any legal obligation of the defendant to support a spouse, minor children or other dependents and any moral obligation to support dependents to whom the defendant is providing or has in fact provided support.

The court may enter a civil judgment against the defendant and may order that the defendant's property be attached for reimbursement for maintenance and support of the defendant as an inmate and for other expenses reimbursable under § 41-11-103.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-11-108. Jurisdiction — Venue — Receivers.

The county may file the civil action in the circuit court. If the defendant is still an inmate in the county jail, venue is proper in the county in which the jail is located.

If necessary to protect the county's right to obtain reimbursement under this chapter against the disposition of known property, the county may seek issuance of a temporary restraining order to restrain the defendant from disposing of the property pending a hearing on an order to show cause why the particular property should not be applied to reimbursement of the county for the maintenance and support of the defendant as an inmate. No bond shall be required of the county before a temporary restraining order is issued.

To protect and maintain the property pending resolution of the matter, the court, upon request, may appoint a receiver.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 9.

41-11-109. Homestead exemption.

The county shall not enforce any judgment obtained under this chapter by means of execution against the homestead of the defendant.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 10.

41-11-110. Cooperation by judge and sheriff of inmate's home county.

The sentencing judge and the sheriff of any county in which an inmate's property is located shall furnish to the attorney for the county all information and assistance possible to enable the attorney to secure reimbursement for the county under this chapter.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 11.

41-11-111. Disposition of funds.

The reimbursements secured under this chapter shall be credited to the general fund of the county to be available for general fund purposes. The county mayor may determine the amount due the county under this chapter and render sworn statements of the amount due. These sworn statements shall be considered prima facie evidence of the amount due.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 12; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-11-112. Applicability — Development districts — Contracting.

This chapter only applies in counties having a population in excess of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), and in any county having a population of not less than eighty thousand (80,000) nor more than eighty-three thousand (83,000), all according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in any other county in which the county legislative body, by majority vote, adopts a resolution electing to utilize this chapter to seek reimbursement.

All other counties shall be grouped by development districts established pursuant to title 13, chapter 14, part 1. For those counties, the comptroller of the treasury shall develop guidelines and solicit proposals for the collection of expenses incurred by the county in relation to the charge or charges for which a person was sentenced to a county jail pursuant to § 41-11-103. The guidelines developed by the comptroller of the treasury may, to the greatest extent possible, be based on the collection procedures established by this chapter or may utilize any other collection procedures and standards in the discretion of the comptroller of the treasury. The guidelines for collection may be based on a statewide proposal, be limited to a proposal by development districts or be a combination of both. In developing the proposals, the comptroller of the treasury shall give consideration to awarding a contract to the person or entity based on a percentage of amount retained, competency or ability to perform, costs incurred in securing reimbursement or be based on any other criteria developed by the comptroller of the treasury. The contract awarded by the comptroller of the treasury shall be a two-year contract.

The reimbursements secured under the contracts, less the fee for collection, shall be deposited into the state general fund and, at least annually, shall be distributed to the general fund of the county in which the inmate was incarcerated. The funds may be used for any lawful purpose.

Acts 1995, ch. 522, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.